Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,164
Operation or parking of unregistered vehicle; penalty.

(1) Any person who operates or parks a motor vehicle or who tows or parks a trailer on any highway, which motor vehicle or trailer has not been registered as required by section 60-362, shall be subject to the penalty provided in sections 60-362 and 60-3,170.

(2) A person who parks a motor vehicle or tows a trailer on any highway, which motor vehicle or trailer has been properly registered in this state but such registration has expired, shall not be in violation of this section or section 60-362 or subject to the penalty provided in sections 60-362 and 60-3,170, unless thirty days have passed from the expiration of the prior registration.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 164;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 50.
July 18, 2026